 So without further ado, I'm going to introduce Eric and he's going to tell us all of his
inspirational insights. Wow! This is an incredible turnout so I thank you all very much for being here and especially thank you to
Tom and Tina and Steve for inviting me to do this. This is a real treat. So, right at the top, let's cover the ground rules. First of
all, I do not want your undivided attention so no need. Everyone here has a cell phone or laptop, forbid just everyone to grab
their cell phone, take it out of their pocket, it's going to take a second, right? Everyone knows how to use Twitter, so please
twitter amongst yourselves. All I ask is that you use the Lean Startup hash tag.
 Everyone understands how to do that? If not, ask a person sitting next to you. Send feedback, comments, anything you find
interesting or uninteresting. I love the feedback and again, Lean Startup hash tag on Twitter. This is incredible. I'm really
excited to do this. So, how many people in the audience are current entrepreneurs? It's just a quick show of hands.
Entrepreneurs? OK. And aspiring entrepreneurs, people hope to be entrepreneurs in the future? OK, that's excellent! The good
news, this has very good news for the United States, for Silicon Valley, for our civilization, so I thank you. But let's talk about
the bad news, for you, which is that most of you are going to fail. And I'm sorry, it's not personal.
 It's not about your level of intelligence or perseverance. That's the fact of entrepreneurship. The majority of companies that
are ever started failed and I brought a demonstration. This is Web 2.0. Everyone remembers that trend. Here's our midterm
report card for Web 2.0. This is how we're doing so far. These are the companies that are no longer with us. I'm sad to say.
And actually even some of the companies that are listed on this chart as successes are just financial successes.
 It doesn't actually mean that they succeeded in validating the incredible human potential in energy and talent that we pour
into them. And look, this a high-tech entrepreneurship so it's a risky business, and we understand that there's going to be some
failure. But I think a lot of the companies that are on this chart and across the whole industry fail for really bad reasons and we
can do something about that. I'll get to that in a moment. But fundamentally, the Lean Startup is a vision for how our industry
could be different. We don't have to accept the same level of failure that we've gotten used to, if we change the way that we
operate and if we are willing to give up on some of our really precious myths of entrepreneurship. So, before we get any
further, let's talk about, what is a startup? Because one of the myths we're going to have to let go, is what I call the "Startup
Dollhouse Fallacy," that a startup is just a shrunken down, big company. And that it'd be nice if that was true, but it's not. That
gives rise to thinking like, for example, big companies have departments. Startups are companies, therefore, startups should
have departments, which is wrong.
Stanford eCorner
Evangelizing for the Lean Startup (Entire Talk)

 And we'll talk about why it's wrong in a minute. But, I want to really emphasize this point, that startups are not like other
kinds of undertakings that you may have heard about, read about, experienced. And because of that, my belief is that although
my background is in consumer Internet high-tech startups, the principles that I want to present to you today have a more broad
applicability. That they work no matter what sector of the economy you're in. In as I've been doing the Startup Lessons Learned
thing the past year, I have gotten the chance to meet entrepreneurs in non-profits, in enterprise, in government. Two weeks
ago, I was presenting these ideas at the Pentagon, to the United States Army, and I wasn't sure whether they would really get
that there's an opportunity for them to behave like startups. But they got it right away. Actually I'm sad to say a lot faster than a
lot of supposedly savvy tech entrepreneurs. So, the thing about startups is that they are human institutions designed to create
something new, under conditions of extreme uncertainty. And it's that uncertainty that really makes it difficult to transplant
practices from other contexts into the startup domain.
 That's why we usually go wrong with a lot of these myths. And it's a human institution. I include that because we usually
think about entrepreneurs as like two guys in a garage, you know, they're eating ramen noodles or something like that. But
what makes you an entrepreneur is not the kind of noodles that you eat; it's the kind of business that you're trying to conduct.
And so because our goal as entrepreneurs is to create a company, an institution, that will outlive us, fundamentally,
entrepreneurship is a management science, which I think is counter intuitive to that kind of heroic mythology we have about
entrepreneurs. So, why do startups fail and what make them succeed? If you look at the real stories of entrepreneurs, as I
know a number if you will get to do in this class, you'll discover really interesting pattern. It's not that successful startup
founders have better ideas than unsuccessful startup founders, actually, and I say this is a startup founder myself. Most
founders have horrifically bad ideas at the start. What differentiates the successful startups from the unsuccessful startups is
something we call the pivot. The idea is that, as we test those ideas against reality, we discover a surprising truth.
 That within every bad idea is a kernel of a good idea waiting to come out. And so if you look at the stories of startups, right,
they began as doing as cyber cash for PDAs and then they became the online payment provider for eBay. What? They started
up building basic interpreters and then they've had the world's largest operating system monopoly. And I know it's fashionable
and there are PR reasons to go back and say they knew all along. That when they made that first basic interpreter, that was
just step one, obviously, towards operating system world domination. But that's after the fact rationalization which is
unfortunately we're very good at. And so I called it a pivot because when tenacious founders discovered that there's something
wrong with their idea, they don't just give up and abandon the whole thing. Instead, they keep one foot firmly rooted in what
they learned with the previous idea and move the other foot into the new direction. So it's not a complete change; it's simply
changing direction, this kind of zigzag pattern that is the path of all successful startups look like. And the premise of the Lean
Startup is actually simple.
 It's just, if we can reduce the time it takes us to do those major iterations, those pivots then we can increase the odds of
finding product market fit and being successful before we run out of money. Is that makes sense so far? OK. So let me tell you
some of my stories because I've had the chance to put some of these ideas into practice and fail quite a few times myself. So
let me tell you about one failure which I refer only euphemistically to as startup number one, for reasons you will understand
momentarily. This is what startup number one look like. OK. I came to Silicon Valley to join this company and I was really
excited. I didn't know what this company did. I just was put through a really challenging technical interview, told to fly to Memo
Park, down the street here and show up at this nondescript warehouse and step inside. And here's what I saw inside.
 I don't know if you can read this banner: We are building something that your friends will lust after and beg to beta test,
yadda yadda. It's not B2B ecommerce like during the bubble, when B2B ecommerce was all the rage. We can't tell you what it
is but we can tell you who's on the team. And then here's the kicker, on startups, it's all about the team. And I had come to
Silicon Valley to learn professional entrepreneurship and when I saw this sign, they had me at hello. I was like, Okay, whatever
this company does, I have no idea but sign me up because we believe in something I call the "IQ Theory of Entrepreneurship."
You just get the smartest, I mean, ungodly smart people in a room together and we'll have them work together on a product.
How could they possibly fail? Because they're so much smarter than everybody else in the world and I know we have some
pretty smart people in the audience today so maybe this sounds familiar. Here's the IQ Theory of Entrepreneurship put
together a plan for world domination in this new industry and this is what it looked like. This is the plan that had me excited
about this company but also, this is why this was a hot company in Silicon Valley. I mean, it was really very exciting to be
asked to join.
 We're going to create a company with a compelling long term vision, so this is not some quick built-to-flip short term thing.
We really want to make a lasting contribution to the internet, change the way people interacted online. Of course, we're going
to raise plenty of capital from top tier investors. We're going to hire the best and the brightest and our aspiration was to create a
product for mainstream customers. So we were going to build it and ship it when it was ready, not a moment before. Because
we aspire to be the next AOL, back when I was still cool and data still a little bit. It was considered naive that the next AOL
would ship buggy software or would God forbid be consigned to some kind of niche offering. It was only for video game people
or something like that, so we did not want that. And how are we going to reach mainstream customers? We had a plan. The
http://ecorner.stanford.edu/ page 2
plan was we would capture that elusive quality called 'buzz', people know about that? We're going to have the blogosphere go
wild in speculation about what we were building because we were going to build our product in stealth.
 No one's going to know what we were building. We would just take all these really smart people and disappear them. See
it's like magic. And then people start to speculate, what could they be building and then we start to file patents. It gets very
exciting. And the idea was, not just that this is a lot of fun believe me, but when we finally did launch we would capture media
attention that really resonated with mainstream customers so they would try our product. So, sound like a good plan? I know
none of you would do a plan like this. But maybe you have a friend, who's attempted this or may be thinking about attempting
this in the future so let this be a lesson. Because we did something I called 'achieving failure'. We burned through about $40
million building this company and after the five years of stealth R&D we felt pretty spectacularly.
 But what you got to understand nothing I say the rest of this lecture is going to make any sense at all if you don't grasp that
we didn't fail to execute the plan. That was not our issue. We had a flawless execution. So we built a really amazing product, a
really compelling technology; we did hire the best and the brightest and we had a great launch. We were in New York Times,
Wall Street Journal, CNN, all right, all the right bloggers saying this is the future of the Internet. And we just had one small
problem, which is that, although we got all these mainstream customers to try our product, none of them like it. And so we
couldn't convert all that energy into a workable business. And so you ask, well how could all those smart people having worked
on it for such a long time have come up with such a bad plan? It's because we were crippled by what I call "shadow beliefs".
These are beliefs that were universally shared within the company, yet were never ever spoken out loud or ever written down.
I'll share three of them with you right now.
 But first, that we know what customers want, which you have to believe that if you're going to devote a 120% of your time
and energy into building a company. But the thing is, entrepreneurs have this ability we call it the 'reality distortion field'. It's the
ability to get people in their vicinity to believe things as if they were true. They're not strictly speaking or literally true. And one
of those things is that people right now desperately need this new technology that we're building inside the reality distortion
field. And I don't want you to get the idea that there's something wrong with that. All entrepreneurs have it, good entrepreneurs,
bad entrepreneurs. The issue is that there's another category of people that can use the reality distortion field and we call them
'crazy people'. All right. So if you want to create a cult, it's extremely useful to have the reality distortion field.
 So the crux of the issue is, how do you know if you're in a startup, and for those who were in a startup today, I know you're
not in this situation but maybe you have a friend. Think about whether the vision that you're following is the vision of a brilliant
startup founder or of a crazy person. We'll get to have to tell the difference in a moment. Number 2, that we can accurately
predict the future, which is something that crazy people sometimes do say, also startup founders. You ought to have a
business plan if you're a startup and the business plan has to have spread sheet in the back in which you explain to your
investors that in year five you'll make a hundred million dollars. Anybody, would like to admit to having that spread sheet in the
back of their plan? Now, there's nothing wrong with having a spread sheet in your business plan. That's a good idea. The issue
is, what happens when we start to believe those projections are literally true, like we're Nostradamus and we know what's
going to happen. In startup number one, we had the spread sheet to say, in year one, we would have million simultaneous
users so on the engineering team, we were really excited while that means we need to build a serious, heavyweight
architecture to support those million users when they show up. And of course when they didn't show up, not only how we
wasted a lot of time on our architecture that no one was going to use, even worse we've lost the agility necessary to change
that architecture because it was this big heavyweight monstrosity that was patent pending but ultimately useless.
 And number three that advancing the plan is progress. When we're in conditions of extreme uncertainty and we don't know
what to do, it's natural to just kind of fall back on what we can see and measure and the easiest thing to see and measure in a
startup is milestones. So, in startup number one, we were very rigorous about making sure that we hit deadlines and we did
what we said what we're going to do and we made the plan. And there's a reason why we were able to execute that good plan.
We held everybody accountable for really doing good work. The only problem is we didn't have a mechanism for asking
ourselves, is this plan any good? Is it worthwhile to advance it? And the issue is that, and this really plagued me as a founder
too, that founders are exceptionally good at keeping people busy, right? It's very easy to just, if you're a charismatic founder
especially, to just sell, sell, sell all day and keep your employees really working hard and your investors believing that
everything's going to be fine. You may notice this pattern that even when a startup fails, if you talk to the founder the day
before it blows up, everything's fine. It's going great, right? We're going great right into a wall. That's the pattern of startup
failure and there's nothing wrong with that. Because every startup founder knows those stories or those companies that were
on the brink of failure and they just managed to pull it out of the tailspin.
 So, we want to keep people busy. But when I was a founder, when I would go to sleep at night, I was plagued by this worry.
OK, I spent the day of my life and a lot of lives of all my co-founders and employees and investors. We spent money; we
expended energy, but did we make any progress? I didn't know how to answer that question and like I said, I know you know
you're not afflicted with this condition but maybe you know a friend who has that worry too. So, the shadow beliefs, I mean, it's
http://ecorner.stanford.edu/ page 3
easy to make fun of people who think they can break the future and crazy people and all that. But I believe, that as an industry,
we have this problem that we've talked a good game about how we're going to listen to customers and we're going to innovate
and do all amazing stuff. And we don't say these shadows beliefs out loud. But if you look at the plans that we routinely make
for companies, I think you'll find them rife with shadow beliefs. And so step one is, of course, to speak them out loud so we can
talk about them and then my hope is that, in the future, we can stop believing them. Or at least, call them into question which is
something that I got the chance to do in startup number two.
 Startup number two, I can actually talk about by name it's called IMVU. It's a 3D avatar, social networking, and instant
messaging product. I was actually just doing a version of this presentation in Japan so I have these screenshots. IMVU's now a
worldwide sensation and very successful and I'm very proud of it and that's great. But that's not what I want to talk to you
about. I want you to go back in time with me to 2004. My co-founders and I had just - we're kind of refugees from startup
number one. And we just had this very embarrassing failure way in the public. We'd wasted a lot of money and there are
people in this room whose money we set on fire. I'm sorry.
 So we thought, all right, we did everything right by Silicon Valley standards and we were praised and we were in this hot
startup and everything was supposed to go fine and we got humiliated. So we thought, well, for God's sake let's just try to make
new mistakes this time. Because what's the worst that's going to happen, I mean, seriously. Startup number one is about as
bad as it gets. And so we built a new plan for IMVU, and I'll tell you a couple of its key components. The first is that we ship this
product in six months. So I'm talking about the full, 3D, instant messaging, social networking, virtual currency, user-generated
content, blogging, photo galleries, the works - in six months. I can see the smiles if people in the engineering department. I can
always tell because I'm doing the math. We call it the 'scope math' in engineering, right? OK, wait a minute.
 The budget was fixed, six months, and we didn't have any money. We were brand new startup, and you built all those
features so something had to give. And I wanted to be super clear about this--this product sucked. OK, I was the VP of
engineering; I was horribly embarrassed to show this to customers. But we were determined that this time we we're going to
find out whether anybody wanted to use this product and I admit. We were really a bit nervous. We brought this crappy product
under our own name. Any journalist who wanted to could have gone to the website and they could have written an article about
idiots from startup number one, you know, foolishly don't know what quality software means. And we were worrying customers
would try it and then they would see that it was terrible and they would tell their friends and we ruined our brand. I mean, we
have these phobias but we needed have worried because nobody used it because nobody cared.
 Those of you who actually shipped the product online know that you don't just put it out there and all of the sudden
everybody starts using it. In fact, we did such a bad job in marketing the product that nobody ever discovered how bad it was.
Well, not exactly nobody. See the thing is, we charged money for that product, which I know is a bad idea, right? It's a horribly
buggy product that would crash your computer and we're charging money for it. But it's not that absolutely nobody would buy
that product. Actually we had certain people who were willing to pay us money for product that basically didn't do anything. And
you're going to ask, who are those people and what's wrong with them? That's a true early adapter. Those are people who
were buying from us, not the product that has existed at that time, but the vision of the product that we thought it would be. And
startup founders sometimes always like to hear this but visionary customers are often smarter and more visionary than the
founders of the companies that serve them. And so by being in constant dialogue with them, from almost day one of our
company's life, we were able to learn a lot of important lessons about what the product needed to become in order to
eventually achieve mainstream success.
 We also ship the product multiple times a day and this is often considered a particularly bad idea because you think about
all the things that could go wrong and I just want to be real clear by what I mean. Engineer would check in codes to the main
trunk. There are no branches for those engineers in the room. And 20 minutes later that code is live in production. So I got
some thumbs up for part one of that statement but I didn't get any for part two. I got one, all right, excellent. We love it, right on
the front row; I like that. And if you think about all the things that could go wrong, right? So some... Thank you, that's excellent.
Thank you very much.
 Exactly my point, but you know what? Here's a thing. You recover. It's fine. It's not the end of the world; mistakes happen.
And I'll talk about at the end of the presentation if they allow us, a practice called continuous deployment, which is the
methodology for being able to ship software this frequently without having the kinds of problems you just witnessed. We didn't
do any PR. There was no launch. We didn't want to repeat the stealth mistake of startup number one. But we also didn't want
to be distracted by serving any constituency other than our customers. And all I can say is that this company has done well.
 IMVU's pretty private about its results but suffice to say, here in Palo Alto, it is a going concern and I'm very proud of what
we've accomplished. So, I had a chance, as Tina said, to spend some time as an advisor to a number of companies, to working
with some venture capital firms and writing these blogs Startup Lessons Learned. And I got to kind of ask myself, how come,
when we did everything right, we got a horrible and embarrassing result and when we kind of did everything wrong, we got a
better result. Is that's just an idiosyncratic fact of our existence or is there some pattern in that noise? And my study of Startups
http://ecorner.stanford.edu/ page 4
throughout Silicon Valley and elsewhere tells me that there actually is a pattern here. I encapsulated as something I called the
Lean Startup. And so let me just tell you a little bit about what that theory is. There are kind of three basic pillars of a Lean
Startup that allow Lean Startups to go faster than their non-Lean competitors. The first is the commodity technology stack. This
is the idea that we can introduce leverage into product development and this has been well-worn territory so I won't re-hash it
here. Suffice to say that, yes this can make building new products cheaper.
 But I think what's really interesting is the amount of time it takes to build really interesting new products is falling fast and
even in the last five years, this has gone really exciting. So I was really proud and in view that we don't take six months to put
that buggy prototype out. But if you want me to pitch me on that same product today and you're going to wait six months to
bring it market, I would laugh at your face. I mean seriously, the ability to build really big interesting new products in really small
amounts time is, I think, unparalleled in history. The second is a methodology called customer development, which we'll talk
about the ability to discover what customers want before it's too late. And the third is Agile or Lean product development but
not the kind of Agile that has been practiced in big companies, kind of tuned for the startup condition. And since we're here, I
thought I would just plug on the topic of customer development. This is Stanford zone Professor Steve Blank. This is the
definitive book on customer development - The Four Steps to Epiphany, Bit.ly/Four Steps. For those who go on laptops, I just
take a moment.
 You can go and buy it now. Go ahead. Everyone has a copy. I trust by now. OK. Good. So let's talk about Agile product
development and what I want to do is try to convince you that the experience I had in Startup 1 and Startup 2 was not just my
idiosyncratic experience but, in fact, represents a kind of a larger trend and so I'll do that by showing what I went through
schematically. And a point of disclaimer is that they are not everybody is interested in software startups per se. Let me just say
that that is my experience but I think these principles have broader applicabilities, I said at the beginning. But I also want to say
and I don't mean to be melodramatic but I do believe that the future survival of our civilization depends on our ability to reliably
shift new kinds of software.
 Why? Because every new product in the industrialized world is either contains software in it now or is built with software
assist. So if we accept the same kinds of failure rates that we've gone used to in a software industry, globally, then I think we're
in a real trouble. I don't think we have to wait for robots to take over our civilization. We're doomed anyway. That's a digression.
It's traditional in our talk about development methodologies to beat up on the waterfall methodology. This is the kind of a
traditional way people are thought to build products. This is how I was trained as an engineer so I will. Waterfall is this idea that
you take a product idea. You turn it into some kind of requirements' document than you collect specifications.
 You build the design for; you implement it. You handed it off to some kind of QA function and it enters into maintenance
mood. So a fundamentally linear batching queue way of building products and although that's fun to beat up on because, of
course, this is what makes achieving failure possible because you're getting this positive feedback about how you're advancing
the plan, even when you're advancing the plan off a cliff. It's actually important to understand that waterfall is appropriate
methodology to use in a certain context. The context when both the problem and the solution you are trying to solve are
relatively well understood. When you can model what's going to happen in the future, you want to do this. The issue is that in
almost all high-tech product development, this is not true. So if you look at the academic research on, for example, on an IT
projects that are built using waterfall, something like 6 out of 10 of them failed outright. Think about that. The lucky 4 out of 10
are the ones that come in way late and way over budget.
 Six out of ten never finished. They just entered the batch size death spiral and you never hear from them again, so luckily
as an industry, we've been working on doing something better. It's called Agile product development. And the inside of Agile is
that we can eliminate kinds of waste from our development process in waterfall. For example, when you build the specification
document that goes stale or you have a meeting where you accomplished nothing, or you build extra APIs that you might need
in the future but then actually while not needing them. All that's a waste and so what we want to do is build the product itself
iteratively so that we change our unit of progress from just advancing to the next stage to creating a line of working code like
the canonical Extreme Programming, example Extreme Programming is an Agile methodology as diagrammed here. It's
something like a big company needs new payroll system and so when you're building payroll, you don't really have to ask what
problem are we trying to solve. OK. Every company makes payroll or it's going out of business pretty soon and so what you
would do in I know traditional waterfall, even those projects fail. But under Agile we would actually collapse the feedback cycle
top so we would take an in-house customer, a product owner, who knows a lot about payroll.
 And we'd sit them to the engineers who are building the products so that if they have a question, like how does the deferred
amortization work? Or how should the screen work? Or what is payroll seriously? How does it work? They have somebody they
can turn to and get authoritative answers, "Excuse, in-house customer, can you explain this to me?" And then they have a
dialogue on the spot, at the moment that the question arises. And so under Agile, we can do big IT project, substantially better
because we're living in a world where the problem is known. It's the solution that's unknown. And if only startups live in this
world, we'd be fine. But, of course, this is what it looks like in startup lab, where both the problem and the solution are
http://ecorner.stanford.edu/ page 5
unknown. So let's say you want to do Extreme Programming, who are you going to sit next to the engineers, if you don't even
know who the customer is. Startup faces problem that there is no authoritative answer yet to the questions they want to ask.
And so what they need to do is combine an iterative process of customer development within iterative process of agile
development tied together in a company-wide feedback loop. And what's interesting about this is, it changes the unit of
progress in an interesting way, and I had to learn this the hard way. And where I talked about how an agile progress is a line of
working code, so when you're doing agile, fundamentally, if you wrote working software today and you go home at night, you
can feel good that you made progress.
 At EnView, we had the strategy. It was brilliant. Here, let me tell you. We we going to deliver this instant messaging product
and the people here are familiar with the theory of "network effects"? Right, that the value of the communication network
increases with the square of the number of participants called the Metcalfe's law. And the theory would say that you can't
create a new instant messaging network because every one is already on some other IM network and in order for them to use
yours, they would have to bring all their friends with them, and that's really cumbersome so that creates a barrier to entry and,
therefore, you just can't create a new network, not an org. So we had this brilliant strategic idea. We would create an instant
messaging add-on that would interoperate with all the existing networks then we would solve this problem by not requiring
people to bring their friends and learn a new buddy list and all that stuff. And at the whiteboard, that seems like a very clever
strategy. The only problem is that, everything I've just said about the strategy of network effects et cetera is wrong as are all
incorrect statements. They just sound good and look good at the whiteboard.
 Leaving aside the question of why it's such a bad idea, I want you to empathize with me personally, for a second, if you
would. It's all about me. I'm speaking, all right, so... I was the one who wrote the software to do IM interoperability across all
those networks and I had to be drawn kind of kicking and screaming to believe that actually all that code, even though it's well
factored and I had the unit test and it was well documented. It was actually all waste. So if I spent the last six months of my life
just doing nothing, building no software at all, I would have contributed just as much value to our corporate bottom line. So if I
killed myself writing the software, I mean, I couldn't believe it. Here, I've done everything right. Again, I'd used the extreme
programming, Agile, everything, and yet, I created this totally wasted software. Why? Because the biggest source of waste in
startup is building something that nobody wants.
 And that's not a technical problem which is kind of frustrating. Right? My theory was I could delegate the business issues to
somebody else. I'd just focus on building good technology and I would be successful. And unfortunately, startups don't fail
because the technology doesn't work. They fail because nobody wants what they're trying to build. And that's what I talked
about at the very beginning that a lot of startups are failing for a bad reason. It's not considered taking a lot of risk. It's because
they're building something that, basically, they could have found out ahead of time nobody wanted. And that's why we have to
break down some of these myths. If you want to operate this way, you got to get rid of the traditional departmental silos that we
build companies with.
 So my suggestion is, instead of we have business and marketing sales, forget that. We have one cross-functional problem
team trying to answer the question: Who's the customer? What problem are we trying to solve while we concurrently have what
we used to call engineering ops and QA, a solution team that's trying to answer the question: Is the current hypothesis for our
product any good? And these two teams operate independently but in close synchronization. That's what allows us to discover
that the current pivot we're on is no good and pick a new one. So to simplify a little bit, here's the fundamental feedback loop
that power startups. This is based on the work of fighter pilot named John Boyd, if anyone's familiar. I highly recommend you
look up his works. And they're called it the OODA Loop. The idea here is that every software company, every startup really is a
catalyst that turns ideas into product, and then we measure that product against reality, discover if it's any good. We collect
data about that, qualitative and quantitative and then, hopefully, we learn for the next iteration. OK, that's not controversial.
 But here's the key idea: We need to measure every proposed process, change, employee, product, everything. It needs to
be measured against this simple question: Does it minimize our total time through this feedback loop? And that's the problem.
With most of the practices that we transplant into startups from big companies and elsewhere, they generally are designed to
optimize only one state of the feedback loop. For example, when I was head of the engineering department at IMVU, I had a
"no metrics" rule. I was like, "Look, customers don't care if you have good metrics so building them is a kind of waste." And I
thought that was really clever because I was able to eliminate the kind of waste I've seen in startup number one, which is
generating all these reports that nobody reads. The problem is that when we shipped that product I mentioned that basically
nobody used, we couldn't figure out why. We just assumed that we liked the product so other people would like it. And so we
would start to bring in customers. You know, I was also our first VP of marketing. I did our first one -- no, $5 a day ad words
campaign -- to bring 100 customers a day to our site.
 And I assumed that we would get half of them to buy it, which any of you who have done direct marketing would be
laughing because we'd be very lucky if we got one in 100. Of course, as you know, we got basically zero. And day in, day out,
we would make the product better. And zero out of 100 people would buy it. And we just assumed that that was a payments
http://ecorner.stanford.edu/ page 6
issue, like we needed to improve our marketing at the point when people were trying to make the sale. That didn't do anything.
So then we started to do, "Well, all right, we'll do a little bit of metrics." Like, "How many people even downloaded the product?"
Zero. Huh. "Well, how many people tried to download the product and failed?" Zero. You start to work your way back up the
funnel to really like, "Well, how many people got from page one where they landed on to page two?" Zero.
 Okay. So the problem that we had was not that we had this horribly buggy product that crashed. It was that we couldn't
even get people from page one to page two. And so we had to start to add metrics to measure the process of users coming
through our product to understand what was happening. But our goal wasn't to create as many metrics as possible. It was to
create as few metrics as necessary to get through this feedback loop. All right? So everything I've said so far is completely
theoretical and I wanted to just try to blitz through a few specifics before we have time to take some questions. What I thought
was: Let's talk about three specific practices. And what these practices all have in common is my belief that each of them,
although they operate at one stage of the feedback loop, actually optimizes the total time to the feedback loop. That's the test
you got to use whenever you're evaluating a startup process.
 So I'm going to talk about continuous deployment -- something they call minimum viable product, and then five why's.
Here's continuous deployment. That's what I talked about before that 20 minutes between checking in code and having it live in
production. So here's the magic that allows you to do that without, you know, taking the site down. In order to do continuous
deployment, you have to be able to like actually physically deploy the software quickly, like I said -- about 20 minutes. Most of
that 20 minutes is actually not the mechanical process of doing the deployment. It's trying to certify that this change is nonharmful
to the business. So just to give you an example, let's say, like, it's April Fool's Day and you were back at my old office
at IMVU. So, hey, this would be hilarious. Let's check in, I don't know, an infinite loop to the front page of IMVU.com so it
doesn't work anymore.
 And let's deploy that because that would be hysterical. Right? OK. You know we go back to my desk; we'd make the
change; we try that on my local sand box; it would blow up; we check it in. And some time in the next 20 minutes, I would get
an email from the cluster effectively: "Dear Eric, thank you so much for attending to check in that change. It's a terrible idea,
and it has automatically been reverted. And not only that, we've notified everybody in the team that this happened and that
something has gone wrong and nobody else can make a change until someone gets to the bottom of what has happened." We,
of course, had to be able to do that revert quickly; and that's got to be true, not just at the level of like unit test and automated
test because the example I just gave is kind of easy. OK, you know, if I make the whole site not work -- like, we can have tests
that catch that. Let me give you a better example. This is actually a real example. Instead of doing that, I'm going to change the
check-out button in the e-commerce flow for IMVU.
 I'm not going to review it because the test would catch that. I'm just going to make it white on white so it's invincible to
humans. OK? So now we're going from having a business to having a hobby -- not a good change. And again, the same thing
would happen. In 20 minutes, that thing would be automatically reverted because the system has the intelligence necessary to
know that we've made the change that is going to impact our business metrics in a catastrophic way. This idea of shutting
down the line when it happens is really important. This is kind of by metaphor to the Toyota production system. Everyone has
heard that story of the andon cord, the cord that any worker can pull to indicate that there's a quality problem that stops the
whole production line. Even though it's very expensive to have the whole production line stopped, it's even more expensive to
let a quality problem kind of fester and proceed down the line. So we use the same idea to lean startup.
 So anytime we have a test failing or a regression that's hit production, we want to stop everything and create the space for
human beings to get to the root cause of what happened. In order for this all to work, we have to work in very small batches. So
just for the engineers in the room, we have one engineer working on a project, say, for three days without checking in and
deploying. We would consider that to be an extremely large batch. It will kind of be like: What's going wrong here? We certainly
have a whole team of five working on something for two weeks all by themselves generating integration risk -- no way. And that
means we have to break large projects down into small batches, which is actually a lot easier than it sounds because 80% of
the work of any new feature is actually all the, like deep interchanges we have to make to reconcile that feature with all the
other features in the product -- make sure we didn't break anything. So there's just hundreds of little changes that are all
supposed to be without side effects, right, and our theory is: If you make a change, and it supposedly has no side effects, let's
deploy that change right now and be sure. Here's what it actually looks like from a technical point of view, for those who are
technical in the room, you know what I'm talking about. For everybody else, these are some key words you can take back to
your startup someday and say, hey, are we doing any of these things? We run all our tests locally in a sandbox. Every one in
the company has the ability to run a simulated version of the product on their own desktop.
 We do continuous integration using a service called Buildbot that means we have unit tests, functional tests, acceptance
test -- every kind of automated test you can imagine. We do that process of incremental deploy that's monitoring the health of
our product as we're doing the deployment to see if there's a problem so we can do -- revert it fast. And, of course, we do real
time -- what we call predictive monitoring which allows us to get a human being up in the middle of the night if we have a
http://ecorner.stanford.edu/ page 7
catastrophic problem. But here is the most important things we do: Whenever somebody sees a failure, we want to get to the
root cause of why. So we're going to ask: How come our defense mechanisms, the cluster immune system didn't catch this?
And every time we fail to catch it, we're going to make our defenses a little bit stronger. That's the essence of continuous
deployment. Let me say a word about minimum viable product. I know people will have heard of this phrase a little bit. The idea
here is we want to kind of -- most startups are torn between these two different approaches to building product. One, which I
call maximizing chance of success, says "Look, we only got one chance at this so let's get it right." Right? That's what I talked
about in startup number one.
 We're going to ship it when it's right and that actually is perfectly rational. If you only have one shot, you want to take the
best shot you can and build the most perfect product you can. The issue is, of course, you know, you can spend, I don't know,
say five years of stealth R&D building a product you think customers want and then discover it to your chagrin that they don't.
So the other possible extreme approach is to say, "Well, let's just do 'release early, release often'." People have heard that
phrase. And this is -look, we'll just throw whatever crap we have out there and then we'll hear what customers say and we'll do
whatever they say. But the issue there is if you show a product to three customers, you get 30 opinions, and now what do you
do? So minimum viable product is kind of a synthesis of those two possible extremes. We want to figure out what's the
minimum set of features necessary to engage with those early evangelists to start the learning feedback loop going and
sometimes, I get to be asked the question: "Well, how do you know if you've found the minimum, minimum viable product?"
And from a theoretical point of view, this is quite challenging. You could make a really interesting argument that any given
feature is absolutely 100% necessary to learn. But the good news is, there's no reason to deal with this theoretical issue
because if you're like me and like every entrepreneur I know, what you think the minimum viable product is, is way too big,
probably two orders of magnitude too many features. I'm not exaggerating.
 So the easy formula for finding out what the minimum viable product is, is take what you think it is right now and cut it in
half and do that two more times and ship it back. And I know, I know, customers are going to absolutely hate that thing. It's only
one-eighth as big as you thought it should be, right? And that's fine. If you ship that and customers say, "You moron, how could
you have shipped without having features X, Y and Z, the things that were all going to be on your road map anyway." You can
say, "Good idea, good point," and then go build features X, Y and Z. But you may be surprised, well, of course, not you, but
maybe you know a friend who would be surprised to ship a product as I did and nobody cares. They don't say, "You idiot, it
should have features X, Y and Z." The worst fate of any shipping of any product is that nobody cares. You don't get any
feedback at all. Right? That's what most features or most products do. They're just dead weight. So what we want to do is try to
eliminate those and ship without them.
 Of course, that's because visionary customers can fill in the gaps. Right? Early adopters can be very forgiving of missing
features. They see the vision and you can be in dialogue with them going through that learning feedback loop. Here are the
kinds of the reasons why people don't do the minimum viable product; I'll just try to address them really quickly: first, the fear of
the false negatives. So I ship my minimum viable product. If it had just that one extra feature, customers would have loved it;
but because it didn't, of course, they hated it. So, duh, why would I bother shipping something I know customers will hate? And
there's nothing wrong with that reasoning. All I want you to do is ship anyway so maybe customers will love it even though it
doesn't have the feature X, and then you can kind of go on and be very successful. And if you're wrong and I really do need
feature X, then you can just build feature X. If you want to do minimum viable product, you have to be prepared to iterate.
 And so you have to have the courage to say, "Yeah, we'll ship something, get negative feedback and respond." The real
startups, real products always have these key features that are always one milestone away. All right, there's like the A features
that we're going to build next, you know, right now; and then the B features that are going to happen in the milestone after. And
if you've ever done this in real life, you'll discover there are these features that are perpetually in category B. They never
manage to get into the current period. They're essential features that just -- but customers actually want this thing over here.
And so you need to just accept that. That's fine. It's OK to have the fantasy that, one day, you'll build this amazing other
product. Meanwhile, you're being really successful with the product you have today. You need to allow that to happen, give
yourself the freedom for that to happen.
 The visionary complex that customers don't know what they want so why the hell am I asking them -- and that's true.
Customers do not know what they want. But when you show them a prototype and get their feedback, you can learn interesting
things about what they do want. So they may say I hate this when, in fact, they would have liked it if it had a few more features.
The idea of this is not to advocate your judgment and responsibility for figuring out what customers ultimately will want. You're
acting on their behalf, not at their request. And then, of course, my favorite, which is that you're too busy to learn so
sometimes, I get the question: "How can you afford to spend all this time collecting all these data?" And it's like, "How can you
afford not to?" I don't really understand that one. And the last, I'll just go through briefly, is something called five why's. The
idea here is that whenever something goes wrong, we want to understand what the root cause is. And this is a little bit
frustrating especially for the more engineering types because it means that behind every supposedly technical problem, there's
actually a human problem that caused it.
http://ecorner.stanford.edu/ page 8
 And if you don't find out what those human problems are, you'll never really going to learn and make progress. So I'll just
give you one quick example: Some code gets checked in and it takes the site down. And you're like, huh, well, why did that
happen? Some engineers use this really obscure API that if it's not used properly, it takes the site down. It's like that's
interesting. Why did they do that? Although, there are new engineer and they were never properly trained in the use of this API.
Well, that's odd. How come they were never properly trained? Oh, it's because their manager doesn't believe in training. What?
We thought we had a technical problem with our server going down and we actually have a managerial problem that relates to
training. My suggestion is that you do that analysis whenever something goes wrong, and then you make what we call a
proportional investment at each of the five layers of the analysis. So you don't say, "Oh, we found a problem; therefore, we're
taking the next six months off to do prevention." But you also don't do nothing.
 You try to find at least one improvement you could make at each of those five stages. So we'll bring the servers back up,
we'll fix that API, we'll go train that engineer. Of course, we'll have a conversation with that manager. But the manager might
say, "Oh, sure, I'm happy to do a new training program for new engineers. You know, that will take about eight weeks. So, you
know, if you don't want me to do anything else for the next eight weeks, I'll work on training," which is basically a fancy way of
saying, "Screw you, we're not doing it." All right. That's manager speak for not going to do it. And the idea of five why's is this,
instead of having that negotiation that's all or nothing, you say, "That's fine." I want you to do the first hour of your eight-week
training program. It's like, "What? I can't do anything in an hour." You say, "That's not true. You could set up a training wiki and
just create a page that says training program goes here.
 And that's it. That's all we're going to do this time. But, see, the next time we have a training problem and we do five why's,
we're going to notice this problem again and we're going to do another hour's work on it. And that person will say we'll all create
the training wiki. It's like, sorry, dude, that's already done. Now, you need to do hour two. And if this problem keeps happening,
we will naturally invest time wherever the problems really are in the kind of technical human combination system that is our
product development team. That's five why's. There's a lot more that I wish we could talk about. Of course, we have very
limited time today.
 A lot of these techniques are discussed in the blog, Startup Lessons Learned. I also am available to do speaking et cetera,
et cetera. You can learn about that online if you are interested in learning more. Before we close though, if you're willing to
indulge me, just -- I'm going to ask everybody, just do this exercise. Just trust me. It will only take a moment. Can you all close
your eyes? I'm always interested to see what ratio of acceptance I get to this idea. OK. Thank you very much for doing that. My
belief is fundamentally you are ready to do this right now.
 No matter what company you work for or what your job is or what's happening, you can do this today. So I ask you
visualize something you could do that you thought of in the last hour. It could be something I suggested. It could be something I
should have said but it didn't. It could be the opposite of what I said because you know better, whatever; something that you
could do in one day to impact whatever company or organization you work for now. And just visualize what that thing is. And
that's it. So thank you all very much. I really appreciate the opportunity to be here. This is my contact information.
 Please get in touch. Thank you all very much. So, Eric, thank you very much. Thank you. I'm Steve Blank, and our class,
The Spirit of Entrepreneurship, is I think at least a quarter of this audience. Can you raise your hands, class? Good. Wave.
Anyway, you did the wave. So our class actually meets before and after all the ETL lectures, and today's extra bonus for our
class is, as we end today, Eric will walk over with us to our classroom and that is the exclusive for being in MS and E 278 as
we get Eric. But in the meantime, Eric, we have a couple of questions called from the massive amounts of questions I've
gotten.
 And I want to ask you the first one which is: Why do you think the Lean startup concepts are only now being adopted? Only
in the last two or year or two do I start hearing about them. What has changed? Is it the venture communities' mass adoption?
Is it change in technology? Does this only work for Web companies? What is it and what is it we should understand that's
happened? Yeah, there's like a real interesting confluence of events that has made this interesting now. I mean, Steve and
others have been talking about some of these ideas for quite a long time, but there are a couple of trends that are really
interesting. One is just the technology trends. There's a fundamental democratization of entrepreneurship as a result of new
technology so talking about the commodity technology stack. What that means is that, there are incredible new products that
you can create without having to ask anybody for permission, without having to get a proprietary license agreement or having
some kind of government approval. Basically, if you can imagine it, you can build it. It's pretty much the de facto way that we
operate in a number of industries so that means there's just a lot more startups available. That's one trend. The other is that as
high-tech industries get more mature, we're starting to move away from technology-risk businesses to market adoption-risk
businesses.
 So we used to say, you know, I want to build a new semiconductor or like someone is like, hey, I'm going to invent
teleportation. And the issue isn't like, if you invent teleportation, will anybody want it? No, we understand that there will be a
market for teleportation. The issue is, what reason do we have to believe that you have -- you can build that, the difference in
http://ecorner.stanford.edu/ page 9
technology and market risks. And then the third thing, I think, is economic downturn. I think that when money was plentiful and
there's a lot of structural reason, there was just an incredible amount of money being invested by private equity and pension
funds, intervention capital funds, we then passing it on to entrepreneurs. So there was really an opportunity to create the most
successful kind of business there is, which is, a Ponzi scheme. Right? You just collect as much venture money as you can and
pay it to yourself by trying to convince people that you're making progress. And, you know, there was a time when in fact it was
-- if what you wanted to do was get rich, that was a pretty decent way to do it. But I think now we're seeing that it has kind of
dried up and so people are trying to remember that entrepreneurship is not actually a get-rich-quick scheme. In fact,
entrepreneurship is not a very good way to make money.
 If you want to become rich, there are a lot more rational and easy ways to do it in a career that has a rational career path
where effort will advance you to the next level and you eventually become wealthy. So, as entrepreneurs, if what we want to do
is build companies of lasting value and the venture money is starting to become a little bit more rational, venture investors are
trying to get a little more savvy. There's this opportunity to talk about, well, what is the best way to build a company to
maximize its chances of success. I think that's what's happening. And I'll take the last question. We'll do 278, and then we'll
open it up to the audience. When you were at IMVU, you and your partner made a series of critical decisions about the
company which eventually led you to lessons learned and the lean startup. But what were two or three of those critical
decisions as an entrepreneur, as the head of engineering and head of marketing, that were obvious and non-obvious at the
time as an entrepreneur? Yeah. What's interesting is that, you know, I talked about how it's easy after the fact of rationalization.
I said the key decision was having me in the company and not have all the good ideas and therefore, of course, that's what
causes us to be successful.
 But if we're being honest, you got to really look at, not what are the smart decisions that we made but what were the
previous decisions we made that caused us to be in a situation where we would make good decisions on an ongoing basis.
That's why I talked about entrepreneurship as a management science. It's crafting a new institution such that everybody in it
will make good decisions on average. So, like, for example, when we ship that early product, we had a revenue plan that we
tried to make. I think the first month's revenue target was $300, and then it was like $350 the next month. I mean, we used to
have investors that would say, "Are there zeroes missing in this graph? All right, is this in thousands?" And we're like, no, it's in
ones. And look, it's actually a lot harder to make $300 of crappy product than maybe it sounds. And so what happened is after
a few months, we couldn't make the revenue plan anymore. I mean we sold to all our friends and family and everyone we knew
got them all to buy -- not as easy as it sounds. And then we started to do that $5 a day ad words and bring people in, and they
wouldn't buy.
 And we started to get ourselves in a situation where we had these even very small targets that we couldn't hit. And it was
that total failure to do what seemed like a very easy thing that caused us to be interested in why is it that customers aren't
buying. So then, we made a lot of good decisions like all right, well, let's do some metrics and measure. Let's bring some
customers into our office. We did about three usability tests a week talking to customers and saying, "Hey, is this the right
thing?" And then I'll talk the flip side of it which is that, because we kept failing to make the revenue plan and we were still
working really hard, eventually, it became clear that the reason we weren't succeeding is not that we weren't working hard
enough. I mean, you can kind of believe that for a certain amount of time; but, eventually, you start to say, you know what,
maybe, just maybe the reason we can't drive these numbers up is because we have the wrong product so we need to pivot.
And that's kind of the interesting pattern that you see with pivots. Even though it's the problem team whose job it is to be trying
to figure out hey, are we solving the right problem, it's generally the solution team, the product development team that discover
it's time to pivot. Because they're just banging their head against the wall, right? The theory says if we make this product just a
little bit better, we'll do a little bit better with customers and yet zero, zero, zero. Eventually, the solution team will say, "You
know what, it's not that we're not working hard enough.
 It's that we are fundamentally going on the wrong direction." And that can create the context for the company to have the
brilliant product insights that then we all take credit for later and say, well, I knew all along. But that was, to me, the key feature.
Great. So let's take questions from the audience now. And let's see. Let's start in the back. And, Eric, if you could repeat the
question when it gets asked. Sure. Ralph? So you mentioned the feedback loop, that's really great. But the hardest part there
is like the measurement part of it.
 And you mentioned you need to get users and that means the right -- sort of right kind of users. So the problem is with this
day and age where there are like thousands of startups especially in the Web where they're trying to compete for their users.
So how do you get those users and how do solve that key distribution to the problem that that makes the cycle go around? Oh,
so the question is: Feedback loop is great; but the hardest part is measuring what customers want. How do you even get those
early customers to begin with? I love questions that start with X is great which means, actually, X is not great. So, well, thank
you for being -- for asking a challenging question which I hope other people will. I don't think this is a distribution problem. So in
a big company, when we're talking about getting users, we're basically talking about distributing a product with many people as
possible. That's a marketing or sales function. Here, we're talking about getting users for a very different purpose. We don't
http://ecorner.stanford.edu/ page 10
want to get as many users as possible.
 And guess what? We don't have to worry about getting the right kind of users -- not a problem. The only customers who will
talk to you at all if you're in a startup are early adopters by definition. So you don't need to worry about like, if someone is
willing to talk to you, don't be like, "Well, they're not the right users." The fact that they're willing to waste their time talking to a
startup means they're probably an early adopter of something. So the specific tactics of how you get those users really
depends on specific industries. I'm a big believer in search engine marketing that has really democratized access to new
customers. You know, Google Adwords is a great product for doing that. I've also had heard stories of people having really
good luck with very cheap campaigns on Stumbleupon which allows you to buy clicks very expensively. There are some people
who are using Facebook ads to be able to target specific kinds of users. And one thing that I have heard a really interesting
story about is, you have a product that's designed to compete with some other product, and you create a Facebook ad that just
says that other product sucks. That's the name of the ad.
 Who clicks on that product? The people who are frustrated with the status quo and then that gives you an opportunity to
talk to those people so that's the kind of technique you need to use to get to those early customers. Yes? I think we got a
question over here. You said that at some point in developing IMVU, you're like really wondering are we doing the right thing,
are we going in the right direction; then you said, we realized we were working on this new thing so we had to make a pivot.
What did you do? What did you change? Oh, yeah. Well, the question is at a certain point, I said we noticed that we were kind
of barking at the wrong tree and it was time to pivot; what did we change, how did we do the pivot? The earliest pivot we did
was from that instant messaging add-on I described that interoperated with other clients to a stand-alone instant messaging
network. That was really counterintuitive to us but we discovered by doing a lot of in-person customer interviews and usability
tests. And we were really just -- we thought we were going to be building a product that was in a social gaming space so,
therefore, the target demographic would be kind of stay-at-home moms; and we were really surprised to discover that it was all
teenagers who were using it. And we kept being like, these teenagers are clogging up our system; we got to get them out of
the way so we can talk to our target customer. So we tried to lock the person out of the system. We couldn't do it.
 We couldn't get them away. They were all teenagers. And so we started to do these interviews with teenagers where we
would have them come in, create an avatar and use the product. And we had this really interesting phenomenon. They'd say,
creating an avatar, that's cool. I would say, "OK, great. It's time for you to invite one your friends on your instant messaging
network." And they kind of look at us and say, "Yeah, no, thanks." We say, "Why not?" "Like, yeah, I don't know if this thing is
cool yet, and I don't think I want to invite of my friends that something that might turn out to be lame." See, we didn't
understand social capital is to, you know, your average teenage high school student. So we'd be like "No, no, try it, try it. You
know, it will be so cool." We tried everything we could go to convince them that it would work. And they said, "No, pretty much
a deal breaker.
 And they kept saying, "Well, I want to try it by myself first, and then, once I realize that it's cool, then I'll invite a friend." And
we said, "Oh, we're from the video game business. We know what that means. That means single player mode." So we built a
version of the product with single player mode -- this is what I'm talking about, the solution team trying to come up with
solutions in response to customer feedback, kind of still in line with the overall like plan. And we would have teenagers, they
come in and they say, "Oh, the avatar is cool." Then we say, "OK. They try it by themselves, and they could kind of use their
avatar and dress it up and that kind of thing. Then we said, "OK, time to invite one of your friends, and they would say, "No,
thanks." We'll say, "Why not?" "This thing isn't cool." "But we told you it wasn't going to be cool. Right? Like, it's a social
product. You have the network effects and the switching costs." And they're looking like, "What, old man, what are you talking
about?" I'm like, no, it does not compute. And so we're like, "Well, but you don't want your own separate buddy lists in instant
messaging network." And they're like, "Why not?" "Well, because of the switching costs and this and that. You know, you don't
want that." Well, I already run eight instant messaging clients so I don't mind another one.
 We're like -- there are eight instant messaging clients? And so we were so far, we made these assumptions about what
customers would and wouldn't do that were just, I mean, in retrospect, ridiculous. And so when we finally were willing to accept
that and once we got over my anger in having built all these code I had to throw out, we then made it into a stand-alone
product and a stand-alone network and it started to take off really from that day. OK. Let's take one more question. Up here? A
question about building the teams and choosing partners -- what's the right team -- right synergy? How do you pick your
partners and what's the right synergy of the team? Boy, I don't know that there's a general purpose answer to that question. I
mean, the successful startups that I have seen run the gamut from people who have been friends forever and really have a
tight bond to people who basically hate their -- hate each other's guts but they want to use this product to resolve the dispute,
you know, longstanding dispute. So, really, it's about, you know, it's really a chemistry question. Like what makes any team
great? You know, I would refer to something like the wisdom of crowds for like the basic rules of how do you create a
successful group environment, which is you have a mechanism for having diverse opinions be aggregated together. So that's --
you know, you want the right level of tension and compatibility where people don't all have -- don't drink the exact same Koolaid
but they do have a shared passion for the ultimate vision that the product's going to go. And then what I would say is, great
http://ecorner.stanford.edu/ page 11
entrepreneurs don't have better ideas, they have better process.
 That's really what fundamentally what I'm trying to evangelize. And so I believe that teams that come together from the very
beginning with the idea of having enough humility and openness to say, we know we're going to iterate, we know we're going to
pivot, I think are more likely to be successful. That's my belief. OK. Eric, so thank you very much. Oh, thank you very much.

Leaving aside the question of why that's such a bad idea, I want you to empathize with me personally, for a second, if you
would. It's all about me. I'm speaking, all right, so... I was the one who wrote the software to do IM interoperability across all
those networks and I had to be drawn, kind of kicking and screaming to believe that, actually, all that code, even though it's
well factored and I had the unit test and it was well documented - It was actually all waste. So if I'd spent the last six months of
my life just doing nothing, building no software at all, I would have contributed just as much value to our corporate bottom line
as if I killed myself writing the software, I mean, I couldn't believe it. Here, I've done everything right. Again, I'd used the
extreme programming, agile, everything, and yet, I'd created this totally wasted software. Why? Because the biggest source of
waste in startup is building something that nobody wants. And that's not a technical problem, which is kind of frustrating. Right?
My theory was I could delegate the business issues to somebody else.
 I'd just focus on building good technology and I would be successful. And unfortunately, startups don't fail because the
technology doesn't work. They fail because nobody wants what they're trying to build. And that's what I'd talked about at the
very beginning that a lot of startups are failing for a bad reason. It's not because they're taking a lot of risk. It's because they're
building something that, basically, they could have found out ahead of time, nobody wanted. And that's why we have to break
down some of these myths. If you want to operate this way, you got to get rid of the traditional departmental silos that we build
companies with. So my suggestion is, instead of we have business and marketing sales, forget that. We have one crossfunctional
problem team trying to answer the question: Who's the customer? What problem are we trying to solve? While we
concurrently have what we used to call engineering ops and QA, a solution team that's trying to answer the question: Is the
current hypothesis for our product any good? And these two teams operate independently but in close synchronization.
 That's what allows us to discover that the current pivot we're on is no good and pick a new one.

I have spent a lot of time with major companies where Im considered some kind of innovation expert, whatever that means. Is that an oxymoron? I dont know. Is that a contradiction in terms? Can you be an innovation expert? I dont know. But anyway, I get the phone call now from companies who want to know, Why should my big company innovate?

And I always tell them the same thing: Because your company will die otherwise. And they get so offended. Like, We are a 100-year-old company. Were the leader in our . . .  Im, like, Hey, listen. Listen. You called me. Im just telling you what I think. And then I try to tell them stories about a kid with a credit cardwith a $1,000 budgetI just saw build a product that, from the consumers point of view, is indistinguishable from your highly polished, multiyear-generation, established product.

And their first reaction is always the same: Well, well just buy that kid if his product is successful. And Im, like, Youre not understanding the moral of the story. Its not that this one kid with a credit card could do this; anyone with a credit card can rent the means of production and compete with you on a first-class basis in their market. And so youre not dealing with one potential competitor but with thousands or millions. Are you really geared up for innovation at that pace? And thats usually when they hang up the phone and say, Im going to call a different expert to tell us what posters to put on the wall. Were looking for easy answers, not that kind of stuff.

But I think that is what is so exciting about technology today. Its like putting Karl Marx on his head. Anybody can rent the means of production, which means entrepreneurship is becoming truly democratized, which means nobody is safe.

All of our process diagrams [in major corporations] are linear, boxed diagrams that go one way. But entrepreneurship is fundamentally iterative. So our diagrams need to be in circles. We have to be willing to be wrong and to fail. But modern management says, Failure means you get dinged.

For example, one of things Ive tried to do is to tell companies, Put on your employees performance evaluation a concept we call productive failure: How many productive failures did you have this year? If someone comes to you and claims that they didnt fail this year, you know one of two things: theyre either lying to your face or they were incredibly, unbelievably conservative.

In both cases, its actually not a positive attribute. You want to say, Show me a time when you failed but learned something really valuable, or were able to pivot from something that didnt work to something that did. I have a lot of examples now where its possible to say: You saved the company an incredible amount of money, because instead of spending $10 million on something, we spent $100,000 and did an experiment that proves conclusively there aint no business here.

Executive sponsorship of a start-up is about learning and supporting the team and going on the journey with them. Its not about reviews and evaluation and go-kill decisions. Its a really different change required at the executive level, at the middle-manager level, and at the line-manager level to do this thing.

But the alternative is to die. So I feel, like, yes, its hardbut thats better than having your company go the way of Kodak or BlackBerry or, you know, pick your favorite company in the last few years thats gone from a $100 billion market cap to $5 billion. And ask yourself, Was playing it safe actually that safe? I dont see the evidence that thats true
I think whats happening in government today is actually very exciting. People look at the political dysfunction that makes it onto the cable news programs, and youre, like, Oh God, weve got problems. And, listen, weve got problems, no doubt.

But behind the scenes, off the radar, not where people are willing to put the cameras, are really small, but I think very hopeful, signsthat we are stumbling our way to a whole new form of governance that is much more about the government as a creator of platforms that allow citizens to solve their own problems.

To me, one of the most precious commodities that government is hoarding at the moment is data. And we have an opportunity to turn that data into useful solutions if were willing to open it up and allow citizens, who ultimately paid for the collection of that data, to have access to it.

So this is not about revealing peoples private secrets; rather, its about taking the data thats already being lawfully and legally collected and making programmatic access to that information available to everybody. And when you do that, you see incredible innovations start to open up, because I think what we are on the verge of is what I call a pro-entrepreneurship public policy.

To be pro-entrepreneurship as a matter of public policy means to make government a tool for helping entrepreneurs get started. Thats what we want. Entrepreneur start-ups are experiments. So just like in a science lab, the more experiments you run, the more likely you are to create something great.

So youve got to ask yourself, Whats going to make it more likely for someone to start a start-up in the first place? Open data is one such thing. If you give people access to the tools, the information about whats happening in the world, you give them the opportunity to stumble on more novel solutions.

 Ill tell you the truth which is that I have extremely fond memories of the first interview that we did. Way back before Lean Startup was cool, you had me on to talk about IMVU and the process that we went through. I remember that as one of the best interviews Ive had the chance to give.
The root cause of startup failure is that we still believe that we can plan for the unknown. Thats a very reasonable thing to believe. All of us who were trained in 20th century functionally specialties, in 20th century management were taught planning and forecasting as a basic tool of our work. So if you do better than planned, you get promoted. You do worse than planned you get fired.

Planning and forecasting requires that we have a long and stable operating history from which to extrapolate those plans. Otherwise theyre totally inaccurate. I say this now to audiences all the time Raise your hand if you feel like the world is getting more and more stable everyday. No one ever does.

Whats happening is entrepreneurship is all about uncertainty, confusion, new products, and disruptive innovation. When we try to plan out whats supposed to happen we get the phenomenon I call achieving failure. Which is where you successfully execute a plan, but its no good. I have this image, like youre driving a car off a cliff, but youre going Were getting great gas mileage!

Thats the problem, and thats all very abstract this problem about management, but it becomes all too real when entrepreneurs try to put it into practice. In the book I mention briefly, but we can talk about it, this is still a painful memory from the very first startup I tried to build. We had what I call the first half of the movie The Social Network experience. So everything in The Social Network that happens up until the point where they get rich and get to sue each other, we had all those experiences.

We were working just as hard. We recruited our friends. We did the whole thing. We were literally in a college dorm on an Ivy League campus. We were onto something really big. We had the idea, get this, for college students to create online profiles for the purpose of sharing. Pretty good, right?



 Yeah, in 2001 that would have made us way ahead of the curve. But, oh, what the tiniest caveat was we thought we should share the profiles with businesses for recruiting purposes. So whats funny about that story to me now is if you got back in time, if you couldve sat with us and said Guys, youre almost onto something, but its actually about the students sharing the profiles with each other, and explained social networking to us, we would have said That is stupid. Come on, were trying to build a real business here. We dont want to just be some dot com eyeballs thing. Were trying to make a real business selling something to somebody. Somebody pays you money for it.

We had this very narrow view of what constitute a real business and we were completely convinced that our vision, our strategy, our plan was going to work. We built a great product, we raised a bunch of money, spent the investors money successfully. Entrepreneurs raise money, promise the moon, you come back a year later  and what do you know for sure? Just what we did? You know the money got spent. Money always gets spent.

We were always busy. All the product milestones were hit. Our product was revolutionary, and technically very cool, and the tiniest little problem was we didnt make any money. So that turned out to be a total disaster.
Its totally sound, in fact I still think its a good idea even to this day. We didnt understand the process that we would need to turn our good product idea into a company. All we understood was step one, work really hard a build a great product. Step two dot, dot, dot. And step three make a lot of money.

We just assumed that if we built a great product and shipped it, it would automatically great value for customers, it would automatically grow and thrive, and we would get to participate in that
 Ill tell you the truth which is that I have a saying in the book, I say If you dont know who your customer is, then you dont know what quality means. So, yes, it actually is true that entrepreneurship is all about creating a great product. Its just that when were sitting in our dorm room, or at the white board in our office imaging the product, what it should be, we have no idea what actually would be a great product.

We have at best a guess, a hypothesis about it that needs to be tested. Ill tell you concretely what the looks like for us at this recruiting company that we built. We had really cool technology, and we did build this cool thing. We thought its a classic chicken and egg business, if you get students in the database, put their resumes in the database that you could sell that asset to companies. Theyll pay you for recruiting. Makes perfect sense, seems very logical at the white board.

So we spent all of our time and energy building this product that would have an algorithmic sorting. Everyone was amazed, it had this very specific workflow built into it that was about how we understood recruiting, what we liked, and had a lot of features that I knew appealed to students to make it easy for them to create a profile.

We launched it with a bang. We spent most of our money on product development and a big product launch. We were hosting parties on campus, had band playing with our t-shirts and stuff. We were very successful in getting the word out to college students that they should create these online profiles.

But then what we had just assumed, that once we had that asset it would be automatically valuable. The companies would then pay us and it turned out that that was just factually incorrect. Once we had it together we couldnt sell it to anybody. Nobody would buy it. We didnt have the credibility necessary to sell the company, we didnt understand how to build a sales process.

But also the product that we had built was not well designed for those specific corporate users. It looked like a college student site, it didnt look right, it didnt feel right, it didnt have the right workflow built into it. So there was no way to transform that product into any kind of a sustainable business.
You want to work backwards from What do we need to make a sustainable business? to then What products can we build where we have am minimum viable product? What MVP do we need to test that hypothesis?

So first of all, whoever pays you money is the customer. So you better understand what that customer demands in order to figure out what to build. Heres the problem, if youve ever worked with a visionary entrepreneur they will be really frustrated when you start talking about customers. Theyre going to be like Listen, customers dont know what they want. And theyre right. Thats true.

If you ask customers what they want, they have no idea. Theres this bug in human psychology which is that when asked to answer how we would behave in hypothetical situations, we cant. We have no idea. You ask someone What will you want to have for lunch tomorrow? Statistically speaking they have no idea.

Now imagine how accurately I can answer the question Do you think you would want to buy this hypothetical product that Im vaguely describing to you that may or may not work? How much would you pay for that? Its like complete garbage.

But imagine I was a scientist, I was a physicist and I came on your program and I said Science is impossible because electrons dont know what they want. We cant ask them questions, and therefore, well never find out the structure.

Youd be like What are you talking about? Thats not science, science is you run experiments to determine empirically what people actually do. Thats the same thing here. We need to devise product experiments that reveal customer behavior in the right way.

So for our recruiting business we absolutely should have built some kind of prototype functionality that would have tested whether employers were interested in buying the product from us right at the beginning. Thats one of the fundamental things we should have been testing.
 I said this on stage so many times especially the last two weeks Ive been on the book tour. I feel so lucky because I get to go onstage and take credit for everybody elses work. The real work of this movement is not me and my book, its what the people do with the ideas. To be honest, when I think about Why am I doing this? People always ask me why am I doing this, when I could be off creating the next Facebook, or making a billion dollars, or people have all kind of random ideas of what I should be doing.

To me, if theres even one person who watches this interview and it changes how they behave, and makes their company more likely to succeed, if I can save even one person from that humiliation, and embarrassment I felt the moment when the company we were just talking about failed. When it failed that feeling in your gut, when you realize that all the cynics who told you this was a bad idea- Unlike in the movies, they were right and youre the one who was wrong.

That is a horrible feeling, and if we can spare from that, how awesome would that be?
Got it. The founders of Aardvark were really hard core technologist. They had worked at some of the big famous tech companies like Google. And they noticed this thing, that they called it social search. Which is, when you ask Google, a subjective question, its terrible. Its really good for objective questions. You know,  Whats the population of United States, What time is it, in Greece right now, you know, really good.

For questions like, Whats the best bar to get a drink, after the game tonight?, and itll say, Oh, oh.. Google does not have an answer for that. Because its not just subjective, in the sense there is no like one best bar. But its also contextual, so that the bar, best bar for you and your kind of person, in a couple of diets, very complicated problem.

They thought, lets kind of build some kind of search product, that will solve that problem. And given their background, you mightve said, Oh, they probably going to lock themselves in the basement, spend a year or two building some complicated AI, algorithm, and then launch it on the world. If they had done that, Im pretty sure they would have been guaranteed failure.

Because its one of these products that depends on so much on what is the exact details of peoples behavior, what they want, how do they behave, what kind of searches they do, what is the best algorithm. There is no way to solve that problem with the white board.

I love the Aardvark team, because they spend the first six months, of the companys life, with a build in commitment, that they werent going to wed themselves to any specific bar. They went through a series of prototypes.

They actually incorporated a company they called,  The mechanical Zoo. And they gave each product an animal name. So that they can be really clear like, This is not the company, this is just our latest test. They made these really funny, whole bunch of prototypes, you look back on the list of things, youre like, What were they thinking?. One was like some kind of notes, Make it easy to make a book mark thing. One was about automating, browsing the web for you. And most of them, like in retrospect like, I cant believe that, that was a good idea.. And thats exactly how I felt about Aardvark, last time I heard it.

For Aardvark the idea for the product was, you would IM this, like AI bot, called Aardvark. And he will ask you questions, and he will go through your social network, and IM friends of yours, to see who might know the answer. Ask them the questions to go get you these, its like agent. I was, Oh, an agent, we were always talked about digital agents, that totally didnt work, and never had done. So I would, I bet if they asked for my opinion, luckily they did not, I wouldve said,  Terrible idea.

But they decided they were going to do a fast prototype of each product. Faking out as much of it as possible. To build the least amount of technology as possible. To discover if it was a good idea. And they spend months building these prototypes doing these tests. And discovering that customers basically didnt like it. And they were like, good thing they didnt build an AI algorithm and all these technology, because customers didnt want it. One of the founders say to me, something like, The results of our experiment, were unequivocally negative, until Aardvark.

So because they had all that failure, of all the products that didnt work, they really understood where it meant, when just a handful of people really gravitated to Aardvark, and are willing to use it, to see that traction.
Well, the good news is, you probably already have some in your friends and family network. But its really important to remember what an early adopter is. Somebody who has the most acute version of your product problems. If someone is so eager to have their problems solved, they are willing to take a chance on an unknown thing. So most of the people you talk to, are not going to fit the criteria, theyre going to look at the product and like, Why would I want to buy this product from you. I mean, think back to the, just like when we were in college, most companies are not going to buy a recruiting solution from bunch of college kid. Unless they really, really, really are having a recruiting problem, and they are really eager to get access to this specific kind of students, that we could offer them. There were certain people who were the right target for that.

So the key is just to be talking to as many people as possible, networking as much as possible, what Steve Flank calls getting out of the building, to screen people to discover who is a good fit for this and who isnt. And the nice thing about early adopters is that theyre insane. Theyre crazy. If you pitch them a solution that really solves their problem they will not let you leave the room without buying it from you. They can be very intense. And thats the kind of response you want because thats the kind of person whos going to be willing to go through the iterations, to be with you through success and failure, to really give you the feedback. Its about casting a wide net that you can then learn Oh, heres the kind of person that makes sense as an early adopter.

Yes. Theres another technique there that was not available to us ten years ago but is now really common which is that we also have the advantage of taking Google AdWords and these really low cost ways of buying customer attention. So another way to find our early adopters is simply to spend a small amount of money on advertising. When we first discovered this technique we spent $5 a day, literally $5 a day. And in those days at 5 cents a click that would buy you 100 clicks a day. So were getting 100 people a day who are opting in to Oh, I have that problem. Then, we call it the magic test: the best way to find your early adopters is simply to put up a web page that says Do you have this problem? Im going to solve it for you. And not really specify, be a little vague on how youre going to solve it. Youre basically saying Im going to solve it buy magic. And then see if people sign up and with those people that sign up then you want to engage in dialog with them. We always say If you cant sell magic, you definitely cant sell your product, because your product is not as good as magic but it still allows you to gather a flow of people who really care about what youre trying to do.
Its true that Google AdWords is getting more expensive but Google is not the only game in town by any means. The key is in traditional direct marketing its all about targeting. You want to get the most efficient yield. For early adopter research its not about targeting at all because you dont know enough to know how to target. So the problem is that everyone uses the same targeting techniques and they always wind up competing with each other, bidding on the same high traffic keyword. What we want to do is find extremely low volume keywords that only a crazy person would put in. Or we can start to do more demographic type ads, Facebook ads. Ive been hearing really good reports for Stumbleupon ads. These kinds of broad spectrum advertising platforms that really arent very well targeted.

We can also borrow a technique from Aardvark. They did this thing called Wizard of Oz testing where you use a technique like Amazon Mechanical Turk to replicate things that the product doesnt actually do. In there case there was still some AI for matching OK, I ask a question, now which of my friends is the best person to answer?, thats pretty hard for a computer to figure out, but not that hard for a human being to do, and they would actually think I thought I was interacting with a computer but there was actually a human being on the other end.

I know companies that are using Mechanical Turk to recruit early adopters. So youre actually paying people, who think they are doing a routine task on Mechanical Turk, but actually youre having them go through a signup club, go through some type of product development experience and all youre doing is measuring their behavior.
Theres really no substitute for physically putting yourself in the same place as early adopters. Anyone whos having trouble with this, that is the most effective thing. Being at trade shows. One company that we talked about in the book actually went to supermarkets because it had to do with groceries and they physically were at supermarkets interviewing customers. So anything that you might do normally as market research. Were trying to transform from focus groups into an experiment. But the same general techniques still apply. Read Craigslist ads. We used to recruit usability testers from Craigslist and say Do you want to try out a cool new thing that kind of looks like this? We would pay people to come into our office. Our early version of our product was so bad we couldnt even pay people to use it. Theyd be like, Oh, keep your 25 bucks. It was a really horrible technique and be face-to-face with someone and see mind-to-mind, this is someone who either gets it or doesnt get it.
Might as well be doomed quickly. Really, the truth is its actually quite hard to get an idea stolen. I often give entrepreneurs this exercise if theyre worried about this, and its literally, take one of your second best ideas, go find the relevant product manager in a company who should be doing that idea and try to get them to steal it. Write them a memo. Send them your business plan. Do whatever it takes to get it stolen, and when you do that you realize that most people face so much inertia, so much politics, so many reasons why they cant be out executing you that even if they have your idea, it really doesnt matter. We have to get over that fear.

But the other thing is remember were not just trying to talk to other people about our idea in general. Most entrepreneurs are eager to pound their chest and tell everyone how great their idea is. We need to be figuring out how to test our idea with customers. So, actually when of my interview co-founders today runs a fireworks software simulation business. He loves fireworks, and this is really a fun thing for him. Its a really cool product.

When it was early on, literally one and one of his engineers would be at fireworks conventions trying to sell people their product, and they had a computer right there where they would demo the product. And then, each day they were trying to sell it. At night they would go back to their hotel room and literally change the product based on what they learned that day to see if they could improve the sales rate for the next day. They were actually changing the demo, changing the features, changing the specs, changing the data sheets, everything so that the speed of the iteration was, instead of months and weeks, it would be every single day they would be running a new [??].
A start-up is a catalyst that turns ideas into products through building. Customers interact with those products that are just a measure generating data. We learn from that data for the next set of ideas. So build, measure, learn. We want to do everything possible to minimize total time through that [??] even if it would otherwise be considered inefficient.

For example, it might be cheaper to outsource your product development to some designer and have them go spend a month cranking on your design, come back, give it to you and now its done. Thats very efficient for the designer. Its very efficient for you, so the whole thing can be achieved. If our goal is to learn, you dont learn anything while theyre off in a cave for a month. If they leave your product, theyre never going to learn anything, and the next day youre like, Oh, I just want to change one more thing.

Well, now youve got to wait a whole other month. What we want to do is whenever possible, collapse down those silo barriers between the function, and we want to say no. Somehow, theres one designer over here working on something, and a programmer over here and a business guy over there. Whenever possible, put the relevant people together in a room so that they can work at the same time.

Even better, if that room happened to be co-located with customers because if you think about the fireworks example, the fact that the engineers are spending their days selling the product to customers, and then back in their room actually making the changes immediately is what encourages that speed of iteration.
 Yeah. I really like this story, and its not just because the CEO is a friend of mine. He also worked with Matthew. Its because its really educational because his product, Food On The Table, is a menu planning service for families, so if youre a parent, youve got to go shopping every week, youve got to figure out what youre going to buy, youve got to come up with recipes that your kids love that are also healthy, that are also cost effective, its the proper good life that most of us have. This is a service that would understand whats on sale at your local grocery store, it would have chefs on staff who are coming up with good, healthy recipes, they would know what your kids like to eat, your dietary restrictions, the menu, the recipes that you yourself like to cook that are easy for you, how much time you have, all this data about you and your family and whats on sale, and it would give you a shopping list and a recipes list once a week and you pay a subscription service for that to help put food on the table.
 I love this. So, the other ones I was mentioning before were looking for early adopters in the supermarkets. And the nice thing about this is when they spend their time with customers in supermarkets, first of all, most customers are like no, Im not interested in that, not willing to buy some recipe thing, but eventually they find someone in the supermarket whos like oh, that sounds really exciting. So theyre doing the usual market research, they ask them hey, do you like it, what do you think? And then at the end of the conversation theyre like great, would you like to buy it right now? And eventually they will find a customer who is like yeah, Ill sign up for that, and they say great, we are going to give you the concierges treatment, which means we will literally go to your house once a week and we will sit down with you and get to know you really well, we will bring the recipes with us, we will figure out the best shopping list for you, we will have a circular, we will know whats on sale, and then we will literally collect a check from you for $4.95 or whatever the price was in exchange, does that sound good to you?

And you know, again, most customers are like no, not interested, but someone who really has this problem is like wait a minute, youre going to personally come to my house and help me with my grocery shopping every week? Awesome. So thats what they did, they only had one customer, not millions. And I see what having only one customer is, you dont need to partner with any other grocery stores because you only have one store you have to support, you dont have to worry about algorithmically figuring out what the persons preference is, you just have one family you need to get to know well, and they serve that one customer. When that customer is satisfied, the product will work well.

Remember, theres no technology now, its all done by hand, then they went to get their second customer. Again, you dont have to support a second grocery store because guess which grocery store were going to go right back to? That same one that the first person stopped at. So, theyre adding customers by hand one at a time, and the only time they started to invest in any technology at all was when they had too many customers that they literally could not have served them any longer. The great thing about that is, when its time to go to technology, youre only using the technology to automate something thats already working. Any engineers who are watching, or if you have any engineers, they will tell you automating something that already works is way easier than building something from a hypothetical stance.

Yeah, so its important to look at the data you collect during the concierges stage really critically because lets say you figure out the model of how your business is going to grow and it requires a certain conversion rate of customers, you say ok, I have X percent of customers who we give a free trial to, this many will become paying customers. Well if the concierges version is only marginally profitable, barely can work according to your model, then you might be worried that the softer models not going to be as good, some of thats going to be a little lower, maybe this actually isnt working, were not on the right track. So its important to understand how to interpret that data so that you can imagine what it would be like in an automated form. But of course, the cusp may be right, because some customers actually prefer an automated form, its faster, easier, quicker, you can just get it on your iPhone today. Most people use it on their smart phone, they literally just do it in the parking lot of the store right before they go in. That actually works me for me than have to have a human being make an appointment for you. Its not that you know everything you need to know doing the concierges approach, it just allows you to get started much sooner than if you take the complicated route.
How frustrating! I want millions of customers, not just one customer. But if you really accept that our job as entrepreneurs is to learn how to build a sustainable business, then learning is our unit of progress, which means that if we have a product that nobody likes, and 100 customers dont like it, whats the learning value of the 101st customer? Nothing. The 100,000th customer? Nothing. All those extra customers just dont like our product. Thats not helpful. We dont learn from having more customers. We have to actually be impatient to build a great product, not impatient to get big. But as a second thing, most entrepreneurs have no clue what causes growth. We just think, Build a great product, put it out there and itll just grow on its own, through some magical force, maybe if we sell it through word of mouth itll grow super fast through word of mouth, but word-of-mouth is actually a very slow growth process. In the book I talk about these three things I call engines of growth, which are the true sources of sustainable growth.

The rule of sustainable growth is: every new customer comes from the actions of past customers. Either through viral growth, which means, that the past customers are an infection vector for the product. Something like Facebook or PayPal. Remember, in an epidemic, a virus is not optional. This is not word-of-mouth. This is not a voluntary thing. These are people involuntarily affecting our firm. Or, the past customers are coming back as repeat customers, as in a product we call the sticky engine of growth, where its addictive, theres a network effect, for some reason the engagement is incredibly high. Something like a cable company or World of Warcraft. Or something called the paid engine of growth, where we take the revenue from past customers and we reinvest it into customer acquisitions through things like outsourcing.
Youve got it exactly right. And heres the thing, we talk about this thing called product-market fit. This is one of those concepts that used to make me crazy as an entrepreneur. The thing about product-market fit is, if youre ever asking, Do I have product-market fit?, then I know for sure that you dont. Its one of those things where you know it when you see it. When I was talking to Mitch Kapor, the founder of Lotus Development Corp. in the 80s, remember? And Lotus wanted to create a commercially successful spreadsheet.
They sold $54,000,000 worth of Lotus 1-2-3 in their first year of business. They went public the next year. These are 1983 dollars were talking about. So they never asked, Do we have product-market fit?. Their products were flying off the shelves as fast as they could manufacture them. When youre in that situation, thats great, but if its not happening to you, the concept of product-market fit does not help you know, Am I getting closer to product-market fit or am I hopelessly far away? And I think that is the root of that frustration you talked about, which is, Gosh, how does getting a handful of customers help me grow? It seems really slow but actually, those customers help you to assess whether youre getting closer to that engine of growth. Remember, each engine of growth is a feedback loop, and like an engine, the faster it turns over, the faster you will go. So if you can get the feeling that the engine is revving and its almost turning, then you can start to realize, Oh, Im getting really close to product-market fit. Let me keep experimenting, let me get that fit going, let me get the engine turning, and then let me crank up the fuel. And you dont have to the big launch and grow crazy fast.
Well, Im happy to tell it. Im a real fan of this company. The acronym that you have trouble remember is the key to have a good acronym. And Dave McClure has this really famous presentation called, Start up metrics for pirates, thats because the acronym falls. AARRR, For Acquisition, Activation, Retention, Revenue, and Referral. Anyway thats just a specific way of modeling the metrics, for a start-up.

And just to get a sense of what Votism is, this is a product thats designed to increase civic engagement, among the citizens in a democracy, who want to get involved in a democratic process. And their most famous product is one that allows you to basically tweet your support for a specific issue or candidate and they translate that into a physical paper letter that gets sent to a relevant politician. So were taking your digital involvement, and they can get translated into the currency that politicians can actually understand.

Thats not how it started at all. And in fact they spend a lot of time trying to build out first couple of versions of product, through all that political oriented social network. And the cool thing about Votism, is that they, of course, they use this R model of metrics. They were able to kind of make predictions about what was supposed to happen. In a social network, you should be getting really high levels of referral, at people like virally spread their product to their friends, and they should have really high retention, if they get sucked in, to the network effects and all that stuff.

Again, when that wasnt happening, then it became easy for them to say, Oh, we need to pivot. But heres the thing, this is the really key point, and this is a little hard to get across the interview, but this is something you actually will have to read the book to get.

We call it, innovation counting, which is a specific way of tracking your progress, using one of these frame works. That helps you figure out if youre hitting the point of diminishing returns or not. Its really important because, heres what happens, most of us have been trained in our job. That if we optimize, we make our product easier to use, better performance, higher quality, then the incremental investment will yield incremental results.

I found this out the hard way, and they found this out the hard way too at Votism. If you had the wrong product, people dont want it, making it easier to use, just helps them realize they dont want it, faster. Its actually incremental investment for no gain. And that actually is the sign that its time to pivot. Its that youre hitting the point of diminishing returns, on the experiments, that you run.

And so we show in the book, the Votism story is one thats doing several pivots. Each one they would start to optimize, now we got the model, and they start to optimize it, make it better easier to use, you see this, they just hit this plateau on those key metrics. And theyre working just as hard, theyre just not getting any kind of return, so then they pivot. The sign of the successful pivot is, now your experiment actually get more productive, not because youre working harder, because now, youre working smarter.
: I call these the vanity metrics. And these are the first of all start-ups. Vanity metrics are the numbers you put in your press release. So that when TechCrunch writes about you, itll make your competitors feel bad. Thats what theyre for.

And the reason companies like to tell TechCrunch their vanity metric, because vanity metrics make your company look good, without actually revealing, any actual information about whats going on.

So I go on TechCrunch, and I like,  bon, bon, bon, bon, I got 10 million messages send to my platform. You like, Wow, thats huge. Is it 10 million people, who all use my product once, and then turned out. Or is it, one guy who really, really likes my product, and scripted his web browser and hes going crazy.

You cant tell the difference. Well, if you cant tell the difference, there is no real information and heres the problem. With Manatee Matrix, if you use that to measure your progress, youre totally screwed. Theres a bug in human psychology. Its the second bug we talk about today. And that is, when the Manatee Matrixs go up, why is that? Well its always because of what I was working on at the time. So when I meet with engineers and say, hey how do you know youre making a progress, they always tell me the exact same thing. Its always like, well last month we did these awesome features, and this month, were getting way more hits to our website, so obviously, QED, that thing caused this thing. And I was like, oh interesting, I have this alternate explanation. I heard that mercury was in retrograde last month, and I believe in astrology, and so if in astrology if mercury is in retrograde, then everybodys numbers go up the next month.

And engineers get so offended. Like, what, how dare you, youre crazy. And Im like, wait a minute, Im just visiting, but you live here, and neither of us knows what caused your numbers to go up. So whos crazy exactly? Right? If you cant tell the difference between astrology and science, youre in trouble. And most of us are currently doing product development in astrology.

But heres whats even worse. When the numbers go down, now whos fault is it? Its never my fault. Its always those idiots down the hall, who sabotaged our great products. So like engineers are like, oh but we made these great features, but those idiots in marketing put a bad campaign out and thats why the numbers went down. But if I go to talk to marketing, they went, we did this great campaign, and the numbers would have been up but those idiots in engineering. Its always like, [??] pointed across.

So in vanity Matrix land, everyone gets to live in their own private reality, or the stuff they do always makes the numbers go up, and the stuff those idiots down the halls do are constantly sabotaging them. And is it any wonder that those companies wind up in this horrible [??] warfare.

So in the Grocket story, Grockets an online education company that I think is going to be very disruptive. They started out in test prep, and in test prep they had this really innovative solution that allows students who are studying for something like the GMAT or SAT to go online and study in a group with other people together so they can basically work together to figure out the answers and teach each other. Its a much more fun way of studying, much more effective way of studying.

When I met them, they were using the classic vanity Matrix for that kind of business to judge success. Something like, one of their matrix was, how many practice questions did students answer yesterday? And thats a giant number, but each student was on there for a long time and they answered all the questions and when that number would go up normally everythings good, but it doesnt tell you if the changes youre making for the product actually caused the numbers to go up, cause the numbers go up because youre getting more press and excitement, and word of mouth. Like if you just took a month off, and nobody came into the office and didnt do any progress development at all, your numbers would probably still be up into the [??] Word of mouth will keep going. Your engine of growth will keep turning.

So we really had to transition that company from these vanity matrix to what we call actionable matrix. Cohort-style matrix and split-testing are the specific techniques. And thats a way of looking at your business. It helps you get a sense of whether your actually impacting customer behavior or not.
Exactly. Its tricky. Like people want slogans and quick answers and the truth is, [??] are so frickin hard, slogans are not going to get it done. It requires a deep understanding of these E-principles and thats why I wrote a whole freakin book about it. But before we get to that, let me just finish by saying, theres one thing that happens with cohort matrix, which is you start to feel like theres a conspiracy against you. I became really paranoid when I first started using Forward Metrics, because, I mentioned we used to do that five dollars a day thing at entry, so we would literally bring in a hundred customers every day, so each hundred customers is the cohort, and we would ask ourselves a simple question like Out of the hundred, how many of them bought the product? and it was really creepy when it was the same every day, like one out of a hundred would buy the product.

After a while, it felt like there was this conspiracy, literally todays customers were all getting on a conference call with yesterdays. Okay guys, how many of you bought the product? One? But no, thats impossible. That couldnt be happening, but how could it be so consistent, especially when were making the product better every day? Right, so when its a couple days in a row youre like, All right, whatever, maybe the things we did from the last few days dont matter. But when its a month and its the same every day, but were fixing hundreds of bugs, adding dozens of new features, making the product so much easier to use, how can the conversion rate be the same? Well, the only logical conclusion I think from that experience, is that what we think is better actually isnt. Were wrong about what product were building, were wrong about customers wanted. We are in so much trouble. Weve got to pivot. Thats why we use these methods, it forces us to make that pivot realization faster, sooner, quicker, cheaper.
